Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB536.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Genetic test." Any of the following: (1) The analysis of deoxyribonucleic acid to identify 12345678910111213141516171819202122 changes in gene sequence or expression levels.(2) The analysis of ribonucleic acid to determine gene expression.(3) Biochemical tests for the presence of gene products. (4) Microscopic analysis of chromosomes. * * *Section 2. Section 13.4(c)(1)(iii) and (viii) and (3) of the act are amended to read:Section 13.4. Genetic counselor.* * *(c) Scope of practice.--(1) A genetic counselor may provide genetic counseling to clients, which includes:* * *(iii) Identify, order and coordinate genetic [laboratory] tests [and other diagnostic studies] as appropriate for the genetic assessment.* * *(viii) Provide written documentation of medical, genetic and counseling information for families, referring providers and other appropriate health care professionals and maintain the documentation in the client's medical records.* * *(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to authorize a genetic counselor to diagnose, [test] manage or treat any genetic disease or condition or other disease or condition.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0536PN0528 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930